Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1721
Collection of taxes; distress warrants; record of county treasurer; exoneration from liability on bond.

The county treasurer shall, in a book containing the personal tax list and the list of all delinquent taxes levied on mobile homes, cabin trailers, manufactured homes, or similar property assessed and taxed as improvements to leased land in columns provided therefor, keep a record of the date of issue of each distress warrant, and of the return thereon, showing in detail the amount collected, or the fact that no personal property, mobile home, cabin trailer, manufactured home, or similar property assessed and taxed as improvements to leased land belonging to the tax delinquent was found. All distress warrants shall upon their return be filed and kept by the treasurer as a part of the records of his or her office. The collection of any item of taxes, the showing by affidavit of poverty, duly approved, or the return of a distress warrant showing no property found shall relieve him or her and his or her bondsperson from responsibility of that item of taxes.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 157, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 6486;

C.S.1922, § 6013;

C.S.1929, § 77-1918;

R.S.1943, § 77-1721;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 67.